Utah statutes.
53A-12-202.   "Textbooks" defined.

For the purposes of Sections 53A-12-201 through 53A-12-206, "textbooks" includes textbooks and workbooks necessary for participation in any instructional course.  Textbooks shall not include personal or consumable items, such as pencils, papers, pens, erasers, notebooks, other items of personal use, or products which a student may purchase at his option, such as school publications, class rings, annuals, and similar items.

